Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-801
Judicial nominating commissions; subject to sections.

All judicial nominating commissions under Article V of the Constitution of Nebraska shall be subject to the provisions of sections 24-801 to 24-812.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 1, p. 472.

Sections 24-801 to 24-812.01 constitute a special, independent legislative act, complete in itself, which is intended to cover the subject of the selection of nominees by judicial nominating commissions. Marks v. Judicial Nominating Comm., 236 Neb. 429, 461 N.W.2d 551 (1990).